Utah statutes.
49-18-102.   Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1) (a)  "Compensation" means the total amount of payments which are currently
includable in gross income made by a participating employer to a member of
this system for services rendered to the participating employer.
(b)  "Compensation" includes:
(i)  performance-based bonuses;
(ii)  cost-of-living adjustments;
(iii)  payments subject to Social Security deductions;
(iv)  any payments in excess of the maximum amount subject to deduction under
Social Security law; and
(v)  amounts which the member authorizes to be deducted or reduced for salary
deferral or other benefits authorized by federal law.
(c)  "Compensation" for purposes of this chapter may not exceed the amount
allowed under Internal Revenue Code Section 401(a)(17).
(d)  "Compensation" does not include:
(i)  the monetary value of remuneration paid in kind, such as a residence or
use of equipment;
(ii)  all contributions made by a participating employer under a system or
plan for the benefit of a member or participant;
(iii)  salary paid to a temporary or exempt employee;
(iv)  payments upon termination or any other special payments including early
retirement inducements; or
(v)  uniform, travel, or similar payments.
(2)  "Final average salary" means the amount computed by averaging the highest
two years of annual compensation preceding retirement, subject to Subsections
(2)(a) and (b).
(a)  Except as provided in Subsection (2)(b), the percentage increase in
annual compensation in any one of the years used may not exceed the previous
year's compensation by more than 10% plus a cost-of-living adjustment equal to
the decrease in the purchasing power of the dollar during the previous year,
as measured by a United States Bureau of Labor Statistics Consumer Price Index
average as determined by the board.
(b)  In cases where the participating employer provides acceptable
documentation to the board, the limitation in Subsection (2)(a) may be
exceeded if:
(i)  the member has transferred from another agency; or
(ii)  the member has been promoted to a new position.
(3)  "Judge" means a judge or justice of the courts of record as enumerated in
Section 78A-1-101.
(4)  "Participating employer" means the state.
(5)  "System" means the Judges' Noncontributory Retirement System created
under this chapter.
(6)  "Years of service credit" means the number of periods, each to consist of
12 full months or as determined by the board, whether consecutive or not,
during which a judge was employed by a participating employer.
